Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
Article 1 Hunting, Trapping, or Fishing
27-2-4.5.
Outdoor mentoring program.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Outdoor mentee” means any resident to whom the department has never issued both a hunting and fishing license, or an outdoor passport, under this chapter.

“Outdoor mentor” means any individual who is 18 years of age or older and who has a current license that allows hunting and fishing pursuant to this chapter.

“Outdoor passport” means a reduced cost license issued by the department which licenses or permits noncommercial hunting and fishing privileges across all categories of hunting and fishing.

The General Assembly finds that an outdoor mentor program can spark interest in hunting and fishing as lifelong activities; provide safe, memorable, and positive introductions for first-time hunting and fishing experiences; and promote safe and ethical hunting and fishing practices.

The department shall establish and maintain an outdoor mentor program that enables experienced hunters and fishers to mentor new hunters and fishers in safe, ethical, and responsible hunting and fishing practices. In furtherance of such outdoor mentor program, the department:

Shall establish a mentor education course that provides instruction to outdoor mentors, the completion of which shall be required before he or she may mentor an outdoor mentee under the program;

Shall work with partners to develop incentives for outdoor mentors and may include reduced license fees for an outdoor mentor participating in the program;

Shall issue outdoor mentees participating in the program an outdoor passport which shall expire one year after issuance; and

Shall prepare necessary applications and impose any further criteria and terms and conditions not inconsistent with this Code section for implementation of the program.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-2-4.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 948, § 1/SB 332.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2018.

27-2-5.
Required hunter education courses.

It shall be unlawful for any person born on or after January 1, 1961, to procure a hunting license or to hunt by means of weapons in this state unless that person has been issued a certificate or other evidence the department deems acceptable which indicates satisfactory completion of a hunter education course as prescribed by the board. Persons ages 12 through 25 shall provide such certificate or other evidence to the issuing agent at the time of purchase of a hunting license. All persons required by this subsection to complete a hunter education course, by buying such license, by receiving a temporary license identification number, or by receiving a license from a telephone license agent, Internet license agent, or other vendor, shall certify by such action their compliance with this subsection.

It shall be unlawful for any person authorized to issue hunting licenses in this state to issue a hunting license to any person age 16 through 25 unless that license agent shall have been provided with a certificate showing the license applicant has satisfactorily completed a hunter education course as prescribed by the board, or to any other person born on or after January 1, 1961, unless such person provides such other evidence of completion of a hunter education course as the department deems acceptable. Internet and telephone license agents may accept a valid hunter education certificate number as fulfillment of this requirement.

It shall be unlawful for any person age 16 through 25 who is not required by law to obtain a hunting license to hunt in this state unless that person carries on his or her person while hunting a certificate attesting to that person’s satisfactory completion of a hunter education course as prescribed by the board. Such person shall present his or her certificate to a game warden or deputy game warden for inspection upon demand.

Any person who is age 12 through 15 shall satisfactorily complete a hunter education course as a prerequisite to hunting with a weapon in this state. It shall be unlawful for any adult to permit his or her child or ward age 12 through 15 to hunt with a weapon unless the child has a certificate attesting to his or her satisfactory completion of such course on his or her person; provided, however, that a hunter education course is not required for a child less than 16 years of age who is hunting under adult supervision by a licensed adult hunter.

Any person applying for an annual or multiyear nonresident hunting/fishing license may provide a certificate of completion or such other evidence of completion the department deems acceptable of the official hunter education or hunter safety course of such person’s state of residence if that course shall have been approved by the department. No one applying for an outdoor passport, a hunting license of less than one year in duration, or a lifetime license shall be required to exhibit such a certificate or to complete a hunter education course in order to obtain the license. Persons holding a lifetime license shall complete an official hunter education or hunter safety course and display proof of completion as specified by the department in order to hunt unless otherwise exempted by this title.

By rule or regulation, the board shall prescribe a course of instruction in competency and safety in hunting and in the handling of weapons. The board shall also prescribe procedures whereby competent residents of this state shall be certified as hunter education instructors. The board may provide, by rule or regulation, for charging reasonable fees for the issuance by the department of duplicate certificates of completion of a hunter education course and for hunter education courses in order to defray the expenses of conducting such courses. Any such fees shall be deemed as “other income” of the department for purposes of subsection (c) of Code Section 27-1-13.

Any person violating any provision of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; provided, however, that this subsection shall not apply to any person under the age of 16.

The requirements of subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section shall not apply to any person hunting on his or her own land or that of his or her parents or legal guardian or to persons permitting a child or ward aged 12 through 15 years to hunt on the parent’s or guardian’s own land.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-302.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 2264, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1177, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 842, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 779, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 946, § 5; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 27; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1013, § 8; Ga. L. 2009, p. 787, § 3/HB 326; Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 7/HB 208; Ga. L. 2018, p. 948, § 2/SB 332; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in subsection (a), substituted “ages 12” for “ages 16” in the second sentence and, in the last sentence, substituted “buying such license” for “signing such license” and inserted “by such action” near the end; substituted “less than 16 years of age” for “age 12 through 15 years” near the end of the last sentence of subsection (d); in subsection (e), inserted “or multiyear” near the beginning of the first sentence, substituted “No one applying for a hunting license of less than one year in duration or for a lifetime license shall be required” for “Those persons applying for a hunting license other than a season hunting license shall not be required” in the second sentence, and added the third sentence. See Editor’s note for applicability.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in subsection (e), in the middle of the second sentence, inserted “an outdoor passport,” and substituted “duration, or a” for “duration or for a”.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game warden” for “conservation ranger” in two places in subsection (c).

Cross references.

Misuse of firearm or archery tackle while hunting, §

16-11-108

.

Liability of volunteers, employees, or officers of nonprofit association conducting or sponsoring sports or safety program; liability of association, § 51-1-20.1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 20/HB 208, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall be applicable to all offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2017.

27-2-6.
Trout license, Georgia waterfowl and migratory bird stamp, big game license, and alligator harvest permit.

It shall be unlawful for any person who has attained the age of 16 years to fish for or possess mountain trout or to fish in any waters designated as trout waters or trout streams pursuant to Code Section 27-4-51 unless such person has in his or her possession a trout license in addition to his or her fishing license.

It shall be unlawful for any person who has attained the age of 16 years to hunt or possess big game unless such person has in his or her possession a big game license in addition to the required hunting license; provided, however, that all nonresidents, regardless of age, must possess a nonresident hunting/fishing license along with any harvest records required by law or regulation to hunt big game in this state.

It shall be unlawful for any person who has attained the age of 16 years to hunt migratory game birds unless such person has in his or her possession a Georgia waterfowl and migratory bird stamp in addition to the required hunting license; provided, however, that a Georgia waterfowl and migratory bird stamp or a landowner Georgia waterfowl and migratory bird stamp shall be required for any resident of this state to hunt migratory birds on premises owned by him or her or his or her immediate family.

It shall be unlawful for any person who has attained the age of 16 years to hunt alligators unless such person has in his or her possession a valid hunting license. A resident or nonresident alligator harvest permit shall be required to harvest an alligator. Such permit shall be free to lifetime license holders if selected as part of any department quota or lottery.

No resident of this state shall be required to obtain a trout license or big game license to hunt, fish, or trap on premises owned by him or her or his or her immediate family.

Any visitor to a state park, whether a resident or nonresident of Georgia, shall not be required to purchase a trout license when fishing in impounded waters on lands owned or leased by the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 38, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 274, § 2; Code 1933, § 45-302, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 21; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2290, § 5; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1255, § 5; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1320, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 506, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 783, § 7; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1550, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 27; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1013, § 9; Ga. L. 2003, p. 654, § 6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 787, § 4/HB 326; Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 8/HB 208; Ga. L. 2022, p. 308, § 3/HB 1233.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in subsection (c), substituted “a Georgia waterfowl and migratory bird stamp” for “an official Georgia waterfowl license” near the end and added the proviso at the end; in subsection (d), substituted “possession a valid hunting license.” for “possession an alligator hunting license in addition to the required hunting license; provided, however, that this subsection shall not apply to lifetime license holders.” in the first sentence and added the last two sentences and deleted “, official Georgia waterfowl license,” following “trout license” near the middle of subsection (e). See Editor’s note for applicability.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “migratory game birds” for “ducks, geese, or swans” near the beginning of subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 20/HB 208, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall be applicable to all offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2017.

27-2-7.
Powers of department as to making and entering into agreements relating to hunting license reciprocity.

The department is authorized to make and enter into agreements, from time to time, with the proper authorities of the States of Alabama, Florida, South Carolina, North Carolina, and Tennessee whereby a citizen of the State of Georgia who owns farm lands in such adjoining states may purchase a resident hunting license in the state in which his land is situated which will permit said Georgia citizen to hunt on his own land in the adjoining state without purchasing a nonresident hunting license in that state. The department is authorized to reciprocate this courtesy and issue a resident hunting license in Georgia to citizens of such adjoining states who own farm lands in Georgia, permitting such citizens to hunt on their own land in Georgia without purchasing a nonresident hunting/fishing license.

The department is also authorized to enter into agreements, from time to time, with the proper authorities of the States of Alabama, Florida, South Carolina, North Carolina, and Tennessee whereby a valid hunting license issued by the State of Georgia will be accepted and honored, as and in lieu of a hunting license for the respective state so agreeing, for hunting waterfowl only, on the banks and in the waters of the lakes, rivers, and streams lying between the State of Georgia and such adjoining state or partly within the boundaries of both the State of Georgia and the adjoining state. In turn, valid licenses issued by the respective state shall be accepted and honored, as and in lieu of a Georgia hunting license, for hunting waterfowl only, on the banks and in the waters of such lakes, rivers, and streams.

The department is authorized to make and enter into agreements, from time to time, with the proper authorities of the States of Alabama, Florida, North Carolina, South Carolina, and Tennessee regarding nonresident hunting/fishing license fees, seasons, and bag limits; provided, however, that such seasons and bag limits for nonresident hunters shall not be less restrictive than those which control Georgia residents; and provided, further, that nonresident license fees in Georgia shall not be less than the amount established in Code Section 27-2-23 for a small game hunting license and for a big game hunting license.

If the commissioner determines that any of the States of Alabama, Florida, North Carolina, South Carolina, and Tennessee does not have an existing reciprocal agreement governing nonresident fishing or small game hunting licenses with the State of Georgia and has a fee for a nonresident fishing or small game hunting license or its equivalent, which substantially differs from the comparable fee which Georgia charges a citizen of that contiguous state, then the commissioner, notwithstanding the fees specified in Code Section 27-2-23, and in order to encourage the reduction of the excessive fee or the entering into of a reciprocal agreement, shall be authorized to adjust the nonresident fishing or small game hunting license fee as applied to citizens of that contiguous state, to an amount equal to the fee a Georgia citizen is required to pay to fish or hunt in that contiguous state.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 389, § 2; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 21; Code 1933, § 45-108, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, § 13; Ga. L. 1983, p. 837, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 27; Ga. L. 1988, p. 842, § 3; Ga. L. 2009, p. 787, § 5/HB 326; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 27/HB 1387.

Cross references.

Agreements with adjoining states regarding fishing license reciprocity, §

27-4-234

.

27-2-8.
Commercial fishing boat licenses.

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in commercial fishing with a boat or vessel in the salt waters of this state without first obtaining a valid commercial fishing boat license for the boat or vessel. The owner or operator of the boat or vessel shall present in writing an application for the license, setting forth such data and information as the department shall require. The application shall be made upon a form prescribed by the department and shall be under oath and duly witnessed by an officer authorized by law to administer oaths.

Fees for licenses required under this Code section shall be as follows:

A trawler (which shall be any boat or vessel which utilizes one or more trawls or power-drawn nets in the taking of shrimp, crabs, or fish), up to and including 18 feet in overall length: $85.00;

A trawler more than 18 feet in overall length: $85.00 plus $3.00 per foot or fraction thereof of overall length in excess of 18 feet; and

All boats other than trawlers, regardless of length: $5.00.

To defray the additional cost of regulating and policing, aliens and nonresidents shall be charged a license fee in addition to that provided by subsection (b) of this Code section in the amount of $150.00 for each trawl boat or vessel used and $50.00 for each boat or vessel other than a trawler used in commercial fishing or in the taking of seafood, which boat or vessel is owned, in whole or part, by such nonresident or alien, provided that, in the event such nonresident or alien applying for the license is a resident of another state which charges nonresidents a license fee greater than the total license fee charged for nonresidents in this state, then the additional license fee provided for nonresidents in this subsection shall be increased to the amount necessary to cause the Georgia nonresident license fee to be the same amount as the nonresident license fee of such other state.

The owner or operator of a trawler licensed according to subsection (b) of this Code section may purchase a trawler crew license as provided for in subparagraphs (W) and (X) of paragraph (8) of Code Section 27-2-23. Such license shall cover all crew members aboard the trawler while fishing, and all such crew members while so covered shall be exempt from the personal commercial fishing license requirements otherwise applicable under this title. Such trawler crew license shall be separate and distinct from any other license, shall be valid only for the trawler for which it is purchased, and shall not be transferable to any other trawler or vessel. Such trawler crew license shall be valid for a fishing year as provided for in Code Section 27-2-3 and shall be carried onboard the trawler while the trawler is in operation for purposes of the trawler crew license.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 237, § 3; Ga. L. 1924, p. 116, § 35; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 25; Code 1933, §§ 45-209, 45-210, 45-211; Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 255, § 1; Ga. L. 1939, p. 185, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 527, §§ 1-12; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 34; Ga. L. 1956, p. 590, § 4; Ga. L. 1967, p. 634, § 4; Ga. L. 1968, p. 202, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 420, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, § 45-305, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 25; Ga. L. 1981, p. 823, § 3; Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 9/HB 208.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “length: $85.00” for “length, $50.00” in paragraphs (b)(1) and (b)(2); added “and” at the end of paragraph (b)(2); substituted “regardless of length: $5.00” for “up to and including 18 feet in overall length, $5.00;” in paragraph (b)(3); deleted former paragraph (b)(4), which read: “All boats, other than trawlers, over 18 feet in overall length, $5.00 plus 50¢ per foot or fraction thereof in excess of 18 feet”; in subsection (c), near the middle, substituted “$150.00” for “$25.00”, inserted “trawl”, and inserted “and $50.00 for each boat or vessel other than a trawler used”; and added subsection (d). See Editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 20/HB 208, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall be applicable to all offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2017.

27-2-9.
Taxidermist licenses; unlawful acts and omissions by taxidermists.

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in the business of taxidermy or provide taxidermy services to anyone other than himself unless he has first been issued a taxidermist license by the department as provided in Code Section 27-2-23. Such license shall authorize the holder thereof to have, at his business premises, wildlife which has been legally taken for the sole purpose of preserving or mounting or preserving and mounting. Such license shall be issued only after submission of an application in such form and containing such information and conditions as may be prescribed by the department.

Any wildlife at the business premises of a taxidermist must have a tag attached displaying a number that can be cross-referenced with the same number in the written records that are required in subsection (f) of this Code section. Any wildlife transferred to another taxidermist must have an additional tag attached showing the name, address, and telephone number of the taxidermist which has the original written record needed for cross-referencing to the numbered tag. Such tags may be removed as necessary during mounting but must otherwise remain on the wildlife until final disposition.

It shall be unlawful for any taxidermist to fail to notify the department of any wildlife in his possession which he knows or reasonably should know was not legally taken.

It shall be unlawful for a taxidermist to sell any wildlife or part thereof without the prior written permission of the commissioner or his designee; provided, however, that it shall not be unlawful for a taxidermist to mount and sell legally taken furbearers, deer, and squirrel, or parts thereof.

It shall be unlawful for a taxidermist to possess or mount any game species for which there is no open season or any endangered, rare, threatened, or unusual species without obtaining a special permit from the department. There shall be no charge for such permit.

It shall be unlawful for any taxidermist to fail to keep at his business premises a written record of all wildlife received by him, which record shall show the name and address of the owner, the date such wildlife was killed, the number and species of such wildlife, and the date received. Each taxidermist shall keep such records at his business premises until he has disposed of the specimen to which the records refer.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title to the contrary, it shall not be unlawful for a licensed taxidermist to mount and sell legally taken furbearers or alligators and alligator products without procuring a fur dealer’s license.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 1674, § 1; Code 1933, § 45-308, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, §§ 29, 30; Ga. L. 1981, p. 798, § 5; Ga. L. 1986, p. 485, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 848, § 3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 386, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 27; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 27.

27-2-10.
Commercial alligator farming licenses.

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in alligator farming unless such person has a valid commercial alligator farming license as provided in Code Section 27-2-23. Any person desiring to establish, maintain, and operate a commercial alligator farm shall apply to the department for such a license.

It shall be lawful for any person with a valid commercial alligator farming license to possess and propagate live alligators and to process and sell or export the hides of the alligators harvested on such alligator farm, provided that it shall be unlawful for any person, including a person with a commercial alligator farming license, to acquire any live alligator, except by propagation of live alligators lawfully in his possession, without first obtaining a permit from the department to acquire the live alligator. It shall also be unlawful for any person, including a person with a valid commercial alligator farming license, to sell, barter, exchange, give, or loan any live alligator to any other person without first obtaining a permit from the department to so sell, barter, exchange, give, or loan the live alligator.

It shall be unlawful for any person with a valid commercial alligator farming license to acquire or possess any alligator hide or carcass except from the harvest of live alligators lawfully in his possession and on his alligator farm.

At such time as is deemed necessary by the department to discharge its responsibilities under this Code section, every person with a valid commercial alligator farming license shall file reports with the department in such form and containing such information as deemed necessary by the department. In addition, every such licensee shall maintain on his business premises records in such form and containing such information as is required by the department to discharge its responsibilities under this Code section.

The board shall have the authority to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations relative to commercial alligator farming including, but not limited to, the power:

To establish standards relating to enclosures, housing facilities, handling, care, and treatment of live alligators on the alligator farm of the licensee;

To establish standards relating to the processing, marking, sale, and exportation of hides of alligators harvested on the alligator farm of the licensee;

To require, at such times as it deems necessary for the department to discharge its responsibilities under this Code section, from each licensee an application for a commercial alligator farming license in such form and containing such information as the department deems necessary; and

To require each licensee to maintain on his business premises records in such form and containing such information as is required by the department to discharge its responsibilities under this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 480, §§ 2-7; Code 1933, § 45-310, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 27.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Commercial alligator farming, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Natural Resources, Wildlife Resources Division, Subject 391-4-11 et seq.

27-2-11.
Game-holding permits.

It shall be unlawful for any person to hold or possess any game animal or game bird for the purpose of propagation or to hold such animal or bird as a pet without first obtaining a valid game-holding permit as provided in Code Section 27-2-23. The department may grant such a permit when, in its discretion, it determines that the issuance of the permit is in the best interest of the game animal or game bird and in the best interest of the wildlife and the citizens of this state. If such a permit is issued, the department shall prescribe the term for each permit and may impose conditions as it determines necessary. Any game animal or game bird held under such permit may not be sold by the holder but must be retained, consumed, or disposed of without charge, in accordance with this title, provided that holders of valid commercial shooting preserve licenses may charge a fee to users of such preserves who take or attempt to take such species. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to authorize the holding or possession of the progeny of any game bird or game animal under the permit under which a parent is held or possessed, unless specifically so stated on the game-holding permit.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 13; Code 1933, § 45-312, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 31; Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, § 20.

27-2-12.
Scientific collecting permits.

It shall be unlawful for any person to take, possess, or transport any of the wildlife of this state, or the plumage, skin, or body thereof, or the nests or eggs of the same for scientific purposes without obtaining a scientific collecting permit and complying with this Code section.

Application for a scientific collecting permit must be made on forms obtained from the department and must be accompanied by the permit fee as provided in Code Section 27-2-23 and a project proposal containing the justification for and an outline of the proposed collecting activities.

The department shall issue such a permit only if it has determined that the proposed collecting activities are in the best interest of the wildlife resources. In making such a determination, the department shall consider the following:

Whether there is a need for the information or data;

Whether the proposed collecting activities would duplicate sound research previously accomplished;

Whether there would be benefit to the species or population being studied;

Whether the project would be detrimental to the particular wildlife population or associated populations or to the habitat of the wildlife; and

Whether the project is of reasonably sound design.

Based on the conditions outlined in subsection (c) of this Code section, such permit may contain conditions on the number and type of wildlife to be collected, the dates and locations of collecting, and the type of gear which may be used. Notwithstanding any other provision of this title to the contrary, the department may authorize the use of baskets, nets, seines, traps, chemicals, and electrical devices for purposes of collecting pursuant to this Code section.

Persons issued a scientific collecting permit shall treat all wildlife humanely and shall notify the department at least three days in advance of the date of collecting. Such persons shall also submit to the department reports detailing the information or data obtained from such collecting activities. The reports shall be submitted by the following March 31 or within 60 days after collecting, whichever is later.

Permits may be denied, revoked, or not renewed in accordance with the procedures outlined in Code Section 27-2-25 for the reasons outlined in said Code section or for any of the following reasons:

Violation of specific conditions listed on the permit;

Excessive collection of wildlife;

Submitting false information;

Failure to maintain records;

Failure to notify the department within three days of collecting activities;

Inhumane treatment of wildlife; or

Any other violation of this Code section or the regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 114, § 2; Code 1933, § 45-304; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 32; Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 12; Code 1933, § 45-313, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-2-13.
Wildlife exhibition permits.

It shall be unlawful for any person to keep, hold, or possess any wildlife in captivity for the purpose of display or exhibition to the public without first procuring a valid wildlife exhibition permit as provided in Code Section 27-2-23. No such permit shall be issued by the department except where the exhibition or display is solely for educational purposes. The department may impose conditions on such permit requiring adequate sanitation facilities, housing, and feed for the animals and insuring the safety of the public in accordance with regulations promulgated by the board. Exhibitions of wildlife by educational institutions; state, city, county, or municipal zoos; or transient circuses shall not be required to procure a wildlife exhibition permit, provided that such exhibitors must comply with all regulations of the board relating to sanitation, housing, feed, and public safety. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to require a permit to exhibit or display fish.

It shall be unlawful for any person holding any wildlife in captivity pursuant to a wildlife exhibition permit to release the wildlife from captivity or to house or maintain the wildlife in such a manner as to pose a reasonable possibility that the wildlife may be released accidentally or escape from captivity.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 20; Code 1933, § 45-314, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 32.

27-2-13.1.
Film production wildlife permits; release.

For purposes of this subsection, the term “film production” means the creation of film, video, or digital projects in this state, including, but not limited to, the creation of feature films, documentaries, series, pilots, movies for television, advertisements, music videos, and interactive entertainment.

It shall be unlawful for any person to keep, hold, or possess any wildlife in captivity for film production purposes or to otherwise provide wildlife for use in film production without first procuring a film production wildlife permit as provided in Code Section 27-2-23. No wildlife may be possessed by the applicant prior to a film production wildlife permit being granted by the department, unless such wildlife was legally possessed by the applicant prior to the grant of the permit. The department may impose conditions on such permit requiring adequate sanitation facilities, housing, and feed for the animals and insuring the safety of the public in accordance with regulations promulgated by the board.

A permit issued pursuant to this subsection shall authorize the permit holder to transport, possess, or transfer wildlife for any permitted purpose related to film production; provided, however, that possession of a permit shall not exempt the holder from any other local, state, or federal requirements.

It shall be unlawful for any person holding any wildlife in captivity pursuant to a permit issued in accordance with this Code section to release the wildlife from captivity or to house or maintain the wildlife in such a manner as to pose a reasonable possibility that the wildlife may be released accidentally or escape from captivity.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-2-13.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 432, § 4/HB 840.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 432, § 6/HB 840, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2016, and shall apply to all offenses occurring on or after such date.”

27-2-14.
Liberation-of-wildlife and liberation-of-domestic fish permits.

It shall be unlawful for any person to liberate any wildlife within this state or to liberate domestic fish except into private ponds except under permit from the department; provided, however, that pen raised quail may be released for purposes of training pointing, flushing, and retrieving dogs.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 20; Code 1933, § 45-315, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 600, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 807, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 948, § 2-3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 1-1, repealed the provisions of the Georgia Pacific White Shrimp Development Aquaculture Act, effective July 1, 2019.
As a result, the amendment by Ga. L. 2004, p. 948, § 2-3, which was never funded and therefore remained dormant, is now moot.

27-2-15.
Wildlife storage permits.

It shall be unlawful for any person operating a grocery store, hotel, market, cold storage house, restaurant, or other commercial facility to receive for storage or to store any wildlife or parts thereof without first obtaining a wildlife storage permit from the department and without requiring the person delivering the wildlife for storage to exhibit a valid license authorizing the person to take or possess the wildlife, provided that nothing in this Code section shall be construed to require a permit to store fish.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 678, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 70; Code 1933, § 45-316, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 33.

27-2-16.
Commercial quail breeder permits; maintenance of records by holders; selling and transporting of pen raised quail generally.

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in the business of propagating quail for food, restocking, propagation, or other commercial purposes unless the quail are pen raised quail and unless the person has obtained a commercial quail breeder permit as provided in Code Section 27-2-23. For purposes of this Code section, the term “pen raised quail” means a quail that has been hatched from an egg laid by a quail confined in a pen or coop.

Each person holding a commercial quail breeder permit shall keep records, in a suitably bound book, of all bird carcasses sold, to whom sold, and the number sold.

It shall be unlawful to sell the carcass of any pen raised quail unless the carcass has been stamped with the following information:

It shall be unlawful to sell pen raised quail which have been killed with a firearm.

It shall be unlawful to transport any pen raised quail without meeting the requirements of this title relating to the transportation of wildlife, provided that nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit the number of pen raised quail which may be transported in this state.

Ga. Department of Natural Resources

Comm. Quail Permit No. _______________ (Name of Breeder) Permit expires

(date)

,

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 28; Code 1933, § 45-317, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 27.

27-2-17.
Falconry permits; duties, permitted acts, and prohibitions pertaining to permit holders.

It shall be unlawful for any person to trap, take, transport, or possess raptors for falconry purposes unless such person possesses, in addition to any licenses and permits otherwise required by this title, a valid falconry permit as provided in Code Section 27-2-23.

It shall be unlawful for any nonresident to trap, take, or attempt to trap or take a raptor from the wild in this state or to transport or possess any raptor in this state unless such nonresident possesses:

A valid falconry license or permit issued by his or her state, tribe, or territory, provided that such state, tribe, or territory has been certified by the United States Fish and Wildlife Service as compliant with applicable federal falconry law; and

All licenses and permits otherwise required by this title.

Application for a falconry permit shall be made on forms obtained from the department.

No falconry permit shall be issued until the applicant’s raptor housing facilities and equipment have been inspected and certified by the department.

The department shall have the right, during reasonable times, to enter upon the premises of persons subject to this Code section to inspect and certify compliance with federal and state standards.

It shall be lawful for a falconer who is in full compliance with this Code section to take small game with raptors, so long as such falconer observes all other laws regulating the taking of small game.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this Code section and to ensure compliance with federal law. If the commissioner certifies that any rule is necessary for compliance with federal law, the board may adopt such rule without complying with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

27-2-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 801, § 1/HB 274.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 801, § 1/HB 274, repealed former Code Section 27-2-17, pertaining to falconry permits; duties, permitted acts, and prohibitions pertaining to permit holders, and enacted the present Code section.
The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 20; Code 1933, § 45-318, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, §§ 34, 35; Ga. L. 1984, p. 568, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2863, § 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 27; Ga. L. 2009, p. 787, § 6/HB 326.